Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.35.030

Rule-making authority. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The public disclosure commission must adopt rules in furtherance of the purpose of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter constitutes a violation under other chapters of this title, or otherwise authorizes the public disclosure commission to take action under RCW 29B.60.020.

[ 2024 c 164 s 498; 2023 c 360 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.62.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.